Utah statutes.
20A-3-310.   Frauds and malfeasance in absent voting -- Penalty.

(1) (a)  It is unlawful for any person to willfully falsify the absentee voter affidavits required by this part.

(b)  Any person violating this subsection is guilty of perjury and may be prosecuted and punished as provided in Title 76, Chapter 8, Part 5.

(2) (a)  It is unlawful for any election officer to:

(i)  refuse or neglect to perform any of the duties required by this part; or

(ii)  violate any of the provisions of this part.

(b)  Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1993 General Session

